Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-511
Service on employee of the state.

Any employee of the state, as defined in section 81-8,210, sued in an individual capacity for an act or omission occurring in connection with duties performed on the state's behalf, regardless of whether the employee is also sued in an official capacity, must be served by serving the employee under section 25-508.01 and also by serving the state under section 25-510.02.

Laws 2017, LB204, § 2.